en: Tartare-style vegan sauces
fr: Sauces véganes façon tartare
hr: Veganski umaci u stilu tartara
lt: Tartare stiliaus veganiški padažai
pl: Sosy tatarskie wegańskie, wegańskie sosy tatarskie

en: Béarnaise-style vegan sauces
fr: Sauces véganes façon béarnaise
hr: Veganski umaci u stilu béarnaise
lt: Béarnaise stiliaus veganiški padažai

en: Hollandaise-style vegan sauces
fr: Sauces véganes façon hollandaise

en: Béchamel-style vegan sauces
fr: Sauces véganes façon béchamel

en: Vegan cheese sauces, Plant-based cheese sauces
sv: Växtbaserade ostsåser, Veganska ostsåser

en: Peanut sauces
de: Erdnusssauce
fr: Sauces aux cacahuètes, Sauce aux cacahuètes, Sauces à l'arachide, Sauces à la cacahuète, Sauces aux arachides, Sauce à l'arachide, Sauce à la cacahuète, Sauce aux arachides
hr: Umaci od kikirikija
lt: Žemės riešutų padažai
nl: Pindasauzen
pl: Sosy z orzeszków ziemnych

en: Maafe sauces, Peanut stew, groundnut stew, Maafe
fr: Sauce mafé, Sauce arachide, Mafé, Maffé

en: Satay sauces
fr: Sauces saté, Sauce saté
hr: Satay umaci
ja: サテソース
nl: Satésauzen

en: Alfredo sauces
zh: 意式奶油白酱

en: Fajitas sauces
fr: Sauces pour fajitas

en: Nordic mustard-dill sauces
da: Hovmestersovse, Hovmestersaucer
fi: Hovimestarinkastike
nb: Hovmestersaus
nn: Hovmeistersaus
sv: Hovmästarsåser
zh: 莳萝芥末酱, 蒔蘿芥末醬

en: Gravlax sauces
da: Rævesovse, Rævesaucer
sv: Gravlaxsåser

en: Taco sauces
da: Tacosovse, Tacosovser, Tacosaucer
fi: Taco-kastikkeet
sv: Tacosåser

en: Mild taco sauces
da: Milde tacosovse
sv: Milda tacosåser

en: Medium-hot taco sauces, Medium-spicy taco sauces
fi: Keskivahvat taco-kastikkeet
sv: Mellanstarka tacosåser, Medium tacosåser

en: Hot taco sauces, Spicy taco sauces
da: Stærke tacosovse
sv: Starka tacosåser

en: Walnut sauces
fr: Sauces au noix

en: Marinades, Marinade
cs: Marináda
da: Marinader, Marinade
de: Marinade
es: Marinados
et: Marinaad
eu: Marinada
fi: Marinadi
fr: Marinade
it: Marinata
ko: 마리네이드
lt: Marinatas
nb: Marinader
nl: Marinade
nn: Marinadar
pl: Marynata
pt: Marinada
sv: Marinader

en: Warm sauces
fr: Sauces chaudes
hr: Topli umaci
lt: Šilti padažai
nl: Warme sauzen

en: Dessert sauces
de: Dessert Soßen
fi: Jälkiruokakastikkeet
fr: Sauces dessert
hr: Desertni umaci
it: Salse da dessert
lt: Desertiniai padažai
nl: Dessertsauzen, Dessertsaus